District of Columbia statutes.
47-201

Salaries of Courthouse protection force and Superintendent of Washington Asylum and Jail; payment; submission of estimates.

The salaries of the force necessary for the care and protection of the Courthouse in the District of Columbia and of the salary of the Superintendent of the Washington Asylum and Jail shall be paid out of the revenues of the District of Columbia and the Treasury of the United States in the manner prescribed by the District of Columbia appropriation acts for the respective years for which such sums are provided, and estimates for such expenses shall each year hereafter be submitted in the annual estimates for the expenses of the government of the District of Columbia.

July 31, 1894, 28 Stat. 202, ch. 174
Mar. 2, 1911, 36 Stat. 1003, ch. 192
June 29, 1922, 42 Stat. 668, ch. 249
June 25, 1938, 52 Stat. 1125, ch. 681, § 1
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1973 Ed., § 47-201.
1981 Ed., § 47-201.